Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 1. Change of Name.

Sec. 29.06.010.
Change of municipal name.

A municipality may change its official name by adopting an ordinance for the purpose that is ratified by the voters and filing the ordinance with the office of the lieutenant governor. Upon receipt of an ordinance ratified by the voters, the lieutenant governor shall issue an order to the municipality changing its name. The name change shall become effective on a date fixed in the order and occurring within 45 days after receipt of the ordinance. A copy of the order shall be transmitted to the department.

If an ordinance adopted under (a) of this section that results in a change of the municipal name is subsequently repealed, the lieutenant governor shall issue an order reinstating the former name within 45 days after the date of the order, unless a different name is adopted as provided in (a) of this section.

When a municipal name change takes effect by means of an order issued under (a) or (b) of this section, a civil or criminal suit, application, petition, hearing or other proceeding to which the municipality is a party and that is pending at or brought after the date the name change takes effect shall proceed in the municipal name as changed by the order.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 5 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Collateral references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 16.

62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 34.